hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Vízmelegítő-kiegészítők: Anódrudak; Melegvíztartályok; Vízmelegítő leeresztő szelepek; Vízmelegítő elemek; Vízmelegítő tágulási tartályok; Vízmelegítő szigetelő takarók; Vízmelegítő edények; Vízmelegítő biztonsági szelepek; Vízmelegítő halmok; Vízmelegítő állványok; Vízmelegítő termosztátok; Vízmelegítő szellőzők
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для водонагревателей: Анодные стержни; Баки для горячей воды; Сливные клапаны водонагревателя; Нагревательные элементы для водонагревателей; Расширительные баки для водонагревателей; Теплоизоляционные одеяла для водонагревателей; Поддоны для водонагревателей; Предохранительные клапаны для водонагревателей; Дымовые трубы для водонагревателей; Подствки для водонагревателей; Термостаты водонагревателей; Вытяжные системы водонагревателей
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Vandvarmer – tilbehør: Anodestænger; Varmtvandsbeholdere; Afløbsventiler til vandvarmere; Vandvarmer – elementer; Vandvarmer – udvidelsestanke; Isoleringstæpper til vandvarmere; Vandvarmer – bakker; Sikkerhedsventiler til vandvarmere; Vandvarmer – stakke; Beslag til vandvarmere; Termostater til vandvarmere; Vandvarmer – aftræk
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para aquecedores de água: Hastes de eletrodo positivo para aquecedores; Cilindros de água quente; Válvulas de drenagem para aquecedores de água; Elementos para aquecedores; Tanques de expansão do aquecedor de água; Mantas isolantes para aquecedores de água; Bandejas para aquecedores; Válvulas de alívio para aquecedores de água; Chaminés para aquecedores; Suportes para aquecedores de água; Termostatos para aquecedores de água; Respiros para aquecedores
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour chauffe-eau: Tiges d’anode; Réservoirs d’eau chaude; Vannes de vidange du chauffe-eau; Éléments pour chauffe-eau; Vases d’expansion pour chauffe-eau; Couvertures isolantes pour chauffe-eau; Réceptacles pour chauffe-eau; Vannes de décharge pour chauffe-eau; Cuves pour chauffe-eau; Supports pour chauffe-eau; Thermostats pour chauffe-eau; Bouches d’aération pour chauffe-eau
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Tillbehör till varmvattenberedare: Anoder; Varmvattenscylinder; Avloppsventiler för varmvattenberedare; Varmvattenbatterier; Expansionstank för varmvattenberedare; Isoleringsfiltar för varmvattenberedare; Tankar till varmvattenberedare; Avlastningsventiler för varmvattenberedare; Skorstenar till varmvattenberedare; Ställ för varmvattenberedare; Termostater för varmvattenberedare; Ventiler till varmvattenberedare
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > 湯沸器・給湯器関連用品: アノードロッド; 貯湯槽; 給湯器用排水バルブ; 湯沸器・給湯器部品; 給湯器膨張タンク; 給湯器断熱ブランケット; 湯沸器・給湯器用パン; 湯沸器・給湯器用安全弁; 湯沸器・給湯器用スタック; 湯沸器・給湯器据置台; 給湯器サーモスタット; 湯沸器・給湯器用排気設備
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Vedenlämmittimen lisätarvikkeet: Anoditangot; Lämminvesivaraajat; Vedenlämmittimien tyhjennysventtiilit; Vedenlämmittimen elementit; Vedenlämmittimen paisuntatankit; Vedenlämmittimien eristyspeitteet; Vedenlämmittimen alusastia; Vedenlämmittimen varoventtiilit; Vedenlämmittimen pystyputket; Vedenlämmittimen jalustat; Vedenlämmittimien termostaatit; Vedenlämmittinen aukot
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do podgrzewaczy wody: Anody; Bojlery; Zawory spustowe podgrzewaczy wody; Elementy podgrzewaczy wody; Dodatkowe zbiorniki do bojlerów; Przykrycia izolacyjne do podgrzewaczy wody; Podstawki do podgrzewaczy wody; Zawory bezpieczeństwa do podgrzewaczy wody; Stojaki na podgrzewaczy wody; Stojaki do podgrzewaczy wody; Termostaty do podgrzewaczy wody; Przewody wentylacyjne do podgrzewaczy wody
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za grijalice vode: Anodne šipke; Spremnici tople vode; Ispusni ventili za bojlere; Elementi grijača vode; Ekspanzijski spremnici za grijače vode; Izolacijski pokrivači za bojlere; Pladnjevi za grijače vode; Ventili za ograničenje tlaka za grijače vode; Dimnjaci za grijače vode; Postolja za grijače vode; Termostati za bojlere; Ventili za grijače vode
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de dispositivo de aquecimento de água: Varetas de ânodo; Depósitos de água quente; Válvulas de drenagem do aquecedor de água; Elementos de aquecimento de água; Tanques de expansão de aquecimento de água; Mantas isolantes para aquecedor de água; Cárteres de aquecimento de água; Válvulas de alívio para aquecedores de água; Acumuladores de água quente; Suportes para aquecedores de água; Termostatos para aquecedor de água; Respiradouros de dispositivo de aquecimento de água
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo pre ohrievače vody: Anódové tyče; Nádrže na teplú vodu; Vypúšťacie ventily pre ohrievače vody; Prvky ohrievača vody; Expanzné nádrže ohrievačov vody; Izolačné plachty pre ohrievače vody; Záchytné vane ohrievačov vody; Poistné ventily pre ohrievače vody; Vývody ohrievačov vody; Stojany pre ohrievače vody; Termostaty pre ohrievače vody; Prieduchy ohrievačov vody
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para calentadores de agua: Varillas de ánodo; Cilindros para agua caliente; Válvulas de drenaje para calentadores de agua; Elementos de calentador; Depósitos de expansión para calentadores de agua; Mantas aislantes para calentadores de agua; Bandeja para calentador; Válvulas de alivio para calentadores de agua; Chimeneas para calentador; Soportes para calentadores de agua; Termostatos para calentadores de agua; Rejillas de ventilación para calentador
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 热水器配件: 阳极棒; 热水箱/热水罐; 热水器排水阀; 热水器元件; 热水器膨胀水箱; 热水器保温毯; 热水器滴水盘; 热水器安全阀; 热水器排气管; 热水器支架; 热水器恒温器; 热水器通风管
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện bình nước nóng: Que anode; Bồn chứa nước nóng; Van xả cặn máy nước nóng; Linh kiện lò sưởi bằng nước nóng; Bình giãn nở máy nước nóng; Tấm cách nhiệt cho máy nước nóng; Chảo đun nước nóng; Van Xả Áp Máy Nước Nóng; Ống dẫn bình nước nóng; Giá Đỡ Máy Nước Nóng; Bộ điều nhiệt cho máy nước nóng; Ống thông hơi lò sưởi bằng nước nóng
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori riscaldatori ad acqua: Aste anodo; Serbatoi per scaldabagno; Valvole di scarico dello scaldabagno; Elementi riscaldatori; Serbatoi di espansione per riscaldatori d'acqua; Coperte isolanti per scaldabagni; Pannelli riscaldatori; Valvole di sicurezza per scaldabagni; Pile riscaldatori; Supporti per scaldabagni; Termostati per scaldabagni; Sfiati riscaldatori
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 온수기 부대용품: 양극봉; 온수 탱크; 온수기 배수 밸브; 온수기 발열체; 온수기 팽창 탱크; 온수기 단열 담요; 온수기 팬; 온수기 압력 릴리프 밸브; 온수기 스택; 온수기 스탠드; 온수기 온도 조절기; 온수기 환기구
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ θερμοσίφωνα: Ράβδοι ανόδου; Δεξαμενές ζεστού νερού; Βαλβίδες αποστράγγισης θερμοσίφωνα; Στοιχεία θερμοσίφωνα; Δοχεία διαστολής θερμοσίφωνα; Μονωτικές κουβέρτες θερμοσίφωνα; Λεκάνες θερμοσίφωνα; Βαλβίδες ασφαλείας θερμοσίφωνα; Σωλήνες θερμοσίφωνα; Βάσεις θερμοσίφωνα; Θερμοστάτες θερμοσίφωνα; Εξαερισμοί θερμοσίφωνα
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за бойлери: Анодни прътове; Резервоари за гореща вода; Изпускателни клапани за бойлери; Водонагревателни елементи; Разширителни резервоари за бойлер; Изолационни обвивки за бойлери; Тави за източване на бойлер; Предпазни клапани за бойлери; Фланци за комини; Стойки за бойлери; Термостати за бойлери; Комини за бойлери
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii încălzitor terasă: Tije anod; Rezervoare de apă caldă; Robinete de scurgere pentru boilere; Elemente încălzitor apă; Vase de expansiune pentru încălzitoare de apă; Mantii de izolație pentru boilere; Tăvi pentru încălzitoare de apă; Supape de evacuare pentru boilere; Evacuări pentru încălzitoare de apă; Suporturi pentru boilere; Termostate pentru boilere; Aerisiri pentru încălzitoare de apă
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Termosifon Aksesuarları: Anot Çubukları; Sıcak Su Kazanları; Su Isıtıcı Tahliye Vanaları; Termosifon Elemanları; Su Isıtıcı Genişleme Tankları; Su Isıtıcı Yalıtım Battaniyeleri; Termosifon Altlıkları; Su Isıtıcısı Emniyet Ventilleri; Termosifon Bacaları; Su Isıtıcısı Ayakları; Su Isıtıcı Termostatları; Termosifon Havalandırmaları
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Water Heater Accessories: Anode Rods; Hot Water Tanks; Water Heater Drain Valves; Water Heater Elements; Water Heater Expansion Tanks; Water Heater Insulation Blankets; Water Heater Pans; Water Heater Relief Valves; Water Heater Stacks; Water Heater Stands; Water Heater Thermostats; Water Heater Vents
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Boiler-Zubehör: Opferanoden; Boiler; Ablassventile für Warmwasserbereiter; Heizelemente; Ausgleichsgefäß für Warmwasserbereiter; Isolierdecken für Warmwasserbereiter; Boilerwannen; Sicherheitsventile für Warmwasserbereiter; Abgasrohre; Ständer für Warmwasserbereiter; Thermostate für Warmwasserbereiter; Heizungslüftung
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til varmtvannsberedere: Anodestenger; Varmtvannstanker; Avløpsventiler for varmtvannsbereder; Elementer til varmtvannsberedere; Ekspansjonstanker til varmtvannsberedere; Isolasjonstepper for varmtvannsbereder; Panner til varmtvannsberedere; Overtrykksventiler til varmtvannsberedere; Registre til varmtvannsberedere; Stativer til varmtvannsberedere; Termostater for varmtvannsbereder; Ventiler til varmtvannsberedere
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Ohřívače vody, bojlery – příslušenství: Anodové tyče; Zásobníky teplé vody; Vypouštěcí ventily ohřívače vody; Díly pro ohřívače vody; Expanzní nádoby pro ohřívače vody; Izolační deky pro ohřívače vody; Ochranné desky pod ohřívače vody; Ventily odvětrání ohřívače vody; Ohřívače vody se zásobníkem; Stojany pro ohřívače vody; Termostaty pro ohřívače vody; Odvod spalin z ohřívače vody
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องทำน้ำร้อน: แท่งกันกร่อน; ถังน้ำร้อน; วาล์วระบายน้ำเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; ส่วนประกอบเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; ถังพักสำหรับเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; ผ้าฉนวนกันความร้อนสำหรับเครื่องทำน้ำอุ่น; ถาดรองเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; วาล์วระบายแรงดันเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; สแตกเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; ขาตั้งเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน; เทอร์โมสตัทเครื่องทำน้ำอุ่น; ท่อลมเครื่องทำน้ำร้อน
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Vandens šildytuvų priedai: Anodiniai strypai; Karšto vandens rezervuarai; Vandens šildytuvų išleidimo vožtuvai; Vandens šildytuvų elementai; Vandens šildytuvų plėtimosi bakeliai; Vandens šildytuvų izoliacinės antklodės; Vandens šildytuvų padėklai; Vandens šildytuvų apsauginiai vožtuvai; Vandens šildytuvų kaminai; Vandens šildytuvų stovai; Vandens šildytuvų termostatai; Vandens šildytuvo ventiliai
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za bojlerje: Anodne palice; Rezervoarji za toplo vodo; Izpustni ventili za bojlerje; Sestavni deli za bojlerje; Razširitveni rezervoarji za bojlerje; Izolacijske odeje za bojlerje; Plošče za bojlerje; Sprostitveni ventili za bojlerje; Izpusti za bojlerje; Stojala za bojlerje; Termostati za bojlerje; Zračniki za bojlerje
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 熱水器配件: 鎂製陽極棒; 熱水儲存槽; 熱水器排水閥; 熱水器元件; 膨脹水箱; 熱水器保溫毯; 熱水器底盤; 熱水器洩壓閥; 熱水器排氣管; 熱水器架; 熱水器溫控器; 熱水器通風管
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Accessoires voor boilers: Anodestaven; Warmwatertanks; Aftapkranen voor boilers; Verwarmingselementen; Expansievaten voor boilers; Isolatiedekens voor boilers; Boilerlekbakken; Overdrukventielen voor boilers; Verwarmingskanalen; Boilerstandaards; Thermostaten voor boilers; Boilerventilatie